Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4278.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This state is designated as a purple heart state to express gratitude and respect for the brave men and women who have been wounded or killed while serving in the United States Armed Forces. Their service and sacrifice allow the United States of America to maintain its sovereignty.